src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Na hAidiactaí Tuairisciúla - Descriptive Adjectives
E. Uí Dhonnchadha
(c)2001
JUN 2012 EUD: Added +Len everywhere lenition is applied i.e. ^Sé 
: May have implications for CG3
##		C O N T I N U A T I O N     C L A S S E S
```
___________________________________________________
###					T Y P E   1
#### 1st. Declension TYPE 1
	MONOSYLLABIC & ENDING IN	-LL (except dall)
1st. Declension TYPE 2
	MONOSYLLABIC : OTHERS
	POLYSYLLABIC & ENDING IN -(MH)AR
**Genitive Singular Masc.	} attenuate	(Noun Declension 1)
1st. Declension TYPE 3
	POLYSYLLABIC & ENDING IN 	-ACH
**Genitive Singular Masc.	} change each->igh, ach->aigh (like Noun Declension 1)
**Vocative Singular Masc.	}
**Genitive Singular Fem.	: change each->í,   ach->aí   (like Noun Declension 2)
1st. Declension TYPE 4
	POLYSYLLABIC & ENDING IN 	-ÍOCH
OR IS IT och -> [] + che ???????
BACK TO USING SAME AS COMPARATIVE FORM IF NECESSARY AT A LATER STAGE).
1st. Declension TYPE 5
	POLYSYLLABIC & ENDING IN 	LONG VOWEL + CH (except lách)
2nd. Declension TYPE 1
	POLYSYLLABIC & ENDS IN 	-IÚIL
2nd. Declension TYPE 2
	OTHERS
3rd. Declension TYPE 1
	ALL (except a few cases - i.e. breá, te)
- LEXICON Adj1-1 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj1-2 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj1-3 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj1-4 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj1-5 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj2-1 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj2-2 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj3-1 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Comp:0 #; 

- LEXICON Adj4-1 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 
- +Adj:^Adj^Coim Fem_gen-D2A_sg;  sync + slen + e

- LEXICON Adj4-2 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj4-3 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

- LEXICON Adj4-4 
- AdjBASE; 
- +Adj+Fem+Com:^Adj Fem_nom_voc_sg; 

### ADJECTIVES QUALIFYING FEM SINGULAR NOUNS

- LEXICON Fem_nom_voc_sg 
adj following a fem. noun is always lenited (^Sé) regardless of whether 
the preceding noun is lenited or eclipsed (neither ??)
as is the vocative after vocative particle "a"

- +Sg+Len:^Sé #; 

- LEXICON Fem_gen-D2A_sg  like Noun Declension 2
- +Fem+Gen+Sg:^Caole #; 
- +Comp:^Caole #; 

- LEXICON Fem_gen-D2B_sg  like Noun Declension 2 but without "e" appended

- LEXICON Fem_gen-D2C_sg  a new change

- LEXICON Fem_gen-D2D_sg  a new change

- LEXICON Fem_gen-D3_sg  like Noun Declension 3

- LEXICON Masc_nom_sg 

- LEXICON Masc_gen-D4_voc_sg  like Noun Declension 4

- +Sg+Len:^Sé #;  hata an fhir bhig - the small man's hat

- LEXICON Masc_gen-D1_voc_sg  like Noun Declension 1

- +Sg+Len:^Caol^Sé #;  

- LEXICON PL-A 
- +Pl:a #;  adj is NOT lenited after a noun ending in a 
-   broad consonantor a vowel! E.G. na mná móra - the big women

- LEXICON PL-A-SLENDER 

- +Pl+Len:a^Sé #;  adj IS lenited after a noun ending in a 
-   slender consonantE.G. na fir bheaga - the small men

- +Pl:e #;  adj is NOT lenited after a noun ending in a 
-   broad consonantor a vowel

-   cathair (city) is a noun with strong plurals
-   obair na bpáistí maithe (work of the good childres)

-   vocative: a pháistí mhaithe - O good children
- LEXICON PL-E-SLENDER 

- +Pl+Len:e^Sé #;  adj IS lenited after a noun ending in a 

- LEXICON PL-TADA-ADJ 	
- +Pl:0 #;  bean (woman) is a noun with weak plurals
- LEXICON AdjBASE 
- +Adj+Base:0 #; 
- +Adj+Base+hPref:^IM^hv #;  e.g. go hiontach
- +Adj+Base+Len:^IM^Sé #;  e.g. ba bhreá, BÁC Thuaidh (adj)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
